Maryland, session 2025, SB0670.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 20–1014.1 of Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis of the Annotated
Code of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 20–1014.2.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
20–102.
This title applies only in Frederick County.
– 1 –

Ch. 823 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
20–1014.1.
(A) THERE IS A CLASS C (THEATER) BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE.
(B) THE MANAGER OF THE THEATER OR ANY OTHER OFFICIAL DESIGNATED
BY THE THEATER MAY SIGN THE APPLICATION FOR THE LICENSE.
(C) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE A LICENSE FOR USE BY A THEATER WITH
SEATING.
(D) THE LICENSE AUTHORIZES THE LICENSE HOLDER TO SELL BEER, WINE,
AND LIQUOR FOR ON–PREMISES CONSUMPTION FROM 1 HOUR BEFORE TO 1 HOUR
AFTER:
(1) A REGULAR PERFORMANCE;
(2) A FUND–RAISER PERFORMANCE THAT BENEFITS THE THEATER;
OR
(3) AN EVENT HOSTED BY AN OUTSIDE GROUP THAT HAS RENTED THE
THEATER.
(E) THE ANNUAL LICENSE FEE IS $150.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 2 –